District of Columbia statutes.
31-102

Establishment of the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking.

The Department, under the supervision of the Commissioner, is established as a cabinet level agency of the District government.

May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 3, 44 DCR 1730
June 11, 2004, D.C. Law 15-166, § 3(b), 51 DCR 2817
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 40(a), 52 DCR 2638
This section is referenced in § 31-1131.02 and § 31-3171.01.
1981 Ed., § 35-122.
D.C. Law 15-166 rewrote the section which had read as follows: “Pursuant to § 1-204.04(b), the Council establishes the Department of Insurance and Securities Regulation as a cabinet level agency of the executive branch of the Government of the District of Columbia, under the supervision of the Commissioner of Insurance and Securities.”
D.C. Law 15-354, in the section heading, validated a previously made technical correction.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(b) of Consolidation of Financial Services Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-381, February 27, 2004, 51 DCR 2653).